Utah statutes.
77-27-9.7.   Victim right to notification of release -- Notice by board.

A victim entitled to notice of the hearings regarding parole under Section 77-27-9.5 shall also be notified by the Board of Pardons and Parole of the right of victims to be advised upon request of other releases of the defendant under Section 64-13-14.7.  The board may include this notification in the same notice sent under Section 77-27-9.5.  The board shall coordinate with the Department of Corrections to ensure notice under this section is provided to victims.



Amended by Chapter 13, 1994 General Session

